Utah statutes.
17-36-49.   Reserve fund for capital improvements -- Investment -- Interest and income.

(1)  All money belonging to a reserve fund created under Section 17-36-46 shall be invested in such securities as are legal for other funds of the county.

(2)  The interest and income from the investments shall be a part of the fund.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 133, 2000 General Session

